Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [299F.363] SMOKE ALARM BATTERY REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Dwelling unit" means a single unit providing complete, independent living facilities for one or more persons, including permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation. Dwelling unit includes only Group R-2 and R-3 occupancies as defined in the State Building Code and does not include: new text end new text begin (1) hotels, motels, or other transient lodging; new text end new text begin (2) commercial buildings; new text end new text begin (3) smoke detection systems that are part of a fire alarm system with a control panel; or new text end new text begin (4) other occupancies not classified as residential dwelling units. new text end new text begin (c) "Sealed battery" means a nonremovable, nonreplaceable battery that powers a smoke alarm for ten years. new text end new text begin (d) "Smoke alarm" has the meaning given in the State Fire Code. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sealed battery requirement. new text end new text begin (a) Effective August 1, 2027, when a smoke alarm in a dwelling unit is replaced, the replacement smoke alarm must be: new text end new text begin (1) equipped with a sealed battery if the smoke alarm contains a battery as a primary or backup power source; and new text end new text begin (2) tested and listed by a nationally recognized testing laboratory for the smoke alarm's specified purpose to standards published on or after October 1, 2022. new text end new text begin (b) This requirement applies when smoke alarms are replaced for any reason, including when they exceed ten years from the date of manufacture as required by the State Fire Code. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin Any violation of this section is a violation of the State Fire Code and is subject to the penalty and enforcement mechanism specified in section 299F.011, subdivision 6. new text end